de: Position des Bindungsriemens: Knöchel; Vorderfuß; Ferse; Spann; Zeh; Sonstige
fr: Position de la sangle de fixation: Cheville; Avant-pied; Talon; Cou-de-pied; Orteils; Autre
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo juostos padėtis: Kulkšnis; Pėdos priekis; Kulnas; Keltis; Pirštai; Kita
en: Binding strap position: Ankle; Forefoot; Heel; Instep; Toe; Other
ru: Положение ремешка крепления: На лодыжке; На передней части стопы; На пятке; На подъеме стопы; На носке; Другое
nb: Plassering av bindestropp: Ankel; Forfot; Hæl; Vrist; Tå; Annet
bg-BG: Позиция на каишката на ски автомата: Глезен; Предна част на стъпалото; Пета; Свод; Пръсти; Други
pt-BR: Posição da alça de fixação: Tornozelo; Antepé; Calcanhar; Peito do pé; Dedo do pé; Outro
pt-PT: Posição da pega de fixação: Tornozelo; Antepé; Calcanhar; Peito do pé; Ponta do pé; Outros
zh-CN: 固定器绑带位置: 脚踝; 前脚掌; 脚后跟; 脚背; 脚趾; 其他
ja: 固定ストラップの位置: アンクル; フォアフット; ヒール; インステップ; トウ; その他
hr-HR: Položaj trake vezova: Gležanj; Prednji dio stopala; Peta; Ris; Prsti; Ostalo
el: Θέση ιμάντα σύνδεσης: Αστράγαλος; Μπροστινό μέρος ποδιού; Φτέρνα; Κουντουπιέ; Δάχτυλα; Άλλο
hu: Kötéspánt elhelyezkedése: Boka; Lábfej elülső része; Sarok; Lábhát; Lábujj; Egyéb
vi: Vị trí dây đeo liên kết: Mắt cá chân; Mũi chân; Gót chân; Mu bàn chân; Ngón chân; Khác
fi: Sidontaremmin asento: Nilkka; Päkiä; Kantapää; Jalkapöytä; Varvas; Muu
tr: Bağlama kayışı konumu: Ayak bileği; Ayak tarağı; Topuk; Ayak üstü; Burun; Diğer
sk-SK: Poloha popruhu viazania: Členok; Predná časť chodidla; Päta; Priehlavok; Špička; Iná
da: Placering af bindingsrem: Ankel; Forfod; Hæl; Vrist; Tå; Andet
it: Posizione della cinghia di fissaggio: Caviglia; Avampiede; Tallone; Collo del piede; Punta; Altro
ko: 바인딩 스트랩 위치: 발목; 앞발; 발뒤꿈치; 발등; 발가락; 기타
sv: Bindningsremmens position: Vrist; Framfot; Häl; Fotvalv; Tå; Övrigt
pl: Pozycja paska wiązania: Kostka; Śródstopie; Pięta; Podbicie; Palce; Inna
cs: Pozice popruhu vázání: Kotníkový; Přes nárt; Patní; Náklon; Přes špičku; Jiné
nl: Bindingriem positie: Enkel; Voorvoet; Hiel; Wreef; Teen; Anders
th: ตำแหน่งสายรัดอุปกรณ์ยึดรองเท้าสกี: ข้อเท้า; หน้าเท้า; ส้นเท้า; หลังเท้า; นิ้วเท้า; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 固定器綁帶位置: 腳踝; 前腳掌; 腳跟; 腳背; 腳趾; 其他
es: Posición de la correa de fijación: Tobillo; Antepié; Talón; Empeine; Dedo del pie; Otro
ro-RO: Poziția curelei de legare: Gleznă; Vârful piciorului; Călcâi; Scobitura piciorului; Vârf; Altele
sl-SI: Položaj traku vezi: Gleženj; Sprednji del stopala; Peta; Nart; Prsti; Drugo